Utah statutes.
13-25a-109.   No-call database.

(1) (a)  In accordance with Subsection (1)(b), the division shall establish and provide for the operation of a no-call database to compile a list of telephone numbers of persons who have provided notice of the person's objection to receiving an unsolicited telephone call.

(b)  The no-call database described in Subsection (1)(a) shall consist of the Utah telephone numbers contained in the national "do-not-call" registry established and maintained by the Federal Trade Commission pursuant to 16 C.F.R. 310.4(b)(1)(iii)(B).

(2)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the division may adopt rules to:

(a)  define the improper use of the no-call database;

(b)  define administrative fines for the improper use of the no-call database, which may not be greater than those imposed for a violation of the national "do-not-call" registry described in Subsection (1)(b); and

(c)  define administrative fines against a person that registers another person to the no-call database without that person's consent.

(3)  Information contained in the no-call database maintained under this section shall be classified as private under Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act, and shall be used only for purposes of:

(a)  compliance with this chapter; or

(b)  a proceeding or action to enforce this chapter.

